Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1153.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. From the funds appropriated to the Oklahoma
Department of Agriculture, Food, and Forestry in Enrolled House Bill
No. 2766 of the 1st Session of the 60th Oklahoma Legislature, the
sum of One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00) shall be used for the
Oklahoma State University Robert M. Kerr Food and Agricultural
Products Center for operational expenses.
SECTION 2. From the funds appropriated to the Oklahoma
Department of Agriculture, Food, and Forestry in Enrolled House Bill
No. 2766 of the 1st Session of the 60th Oklahoma Legislature, the
sum of Five Million Two Hundred Thousand Dollars ($5,200,000.00)
shall be used for the extension offices that are affiliated with the
Oklahoma State University Cooperative Extension Service.
SECTION 3. From the funds appropriated to the Oklahoma
Department of Agriculture, Food, and Forestry in Enrolled House Bill
No. 2766 of the 1st Session of the 60th Oklahoma Legislature, the
sum of One Million Three Hundred Thousand Dollars ($1,300,000.00)

shall be used for research centers that are affiliated with Oklahoma
State University Agriculture Experiment Stations.
SECTION 4. From the funds appropriated to the Oklahoma
Department of Agriculture, Food, and Forestry in Enrolled House Bill
No. 2766 of the 1st Session of the 60th Oklahoma Legislature, the
sum of Five Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($5,500,000.00)
shall be used for cooperative extension and agriculture research
programs that are affiliated with Langston University.
SECTION 5. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 6. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1153 Page 2

Passed the Senate the 20th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 22nd day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1153 Page 3